New York, session 2025-2026, A3937.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 305 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 63 to read as follows: 3 63. The commissioner shall establish and enforce rules and regulations 4 requiring every institution of higher education that offers a graduate 5 or undergraduate degree or certification program in education or educa- 6 tional administration located within the state to incorporate at least a 7 three-credit course devoted to the instructional techniques necessary 8 for effective literacy instruction. Such course shall impart to prospec- 9 tive and current teachers language-based, effective methods of teaching 10 reading, which shall include instruction in delivering structured, 11 systematic, explicit, evidence-based instruction aligned with the 12 science of reading, also known as structured literacy, within the 13 current required literacy curriculum. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 15 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04659-02-5